Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1708.01
Financial institution, defined.

Financial institution shall mean a bank, savings bank, building and loan association, savings and loan association, or credit union, whether chartered by the United States, the department, or a foreign state agency; any other similar organization which is covered by federal deposit insurance; or a trust company.

Laws 2017, LB375, § 2.